Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2861.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; FORENSIC NAVIGATOR SERVICES.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 and $....... in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the supreme court for forensic navigator services in each of the ten judicial districts. The amount given to each district must be based on the population of the district according to the most recent United States census data. In distributing funds, the supreme court may also consider the specific needs of each district, including disparities in current available resources, travel time and costs for forensic navigators in rural areas, and video technology for remote hearings. new text end